California, session 20252026, AB1637.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2266.1 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2266.1.A2266.1. (a) For purposes of this section, “patient notes” means notes, after-visit summaries, and diagnosis and treatment plans.(b) A physician and surgeon’s patient medical documentation notes shall be the responsibility of that physician and surgeon, regardless of the clinical setting. A(c) A physician and surgeon’s patient notes, after-visit summaries, and diagnosis and treatment plans notes shall not be altered, modified, or edited in any fashion by anyone other than the authoring physician and surgeon. surgeon or any of the following:(1) A scribe, medical assistant, or other authorized individual acting under the authority delegated by the authoring physician and surgeon.(2) A physician and surgeon who is adding to an authoring physician and surgeon’s patient notes if patient care has been transferred from the authoring physician and surgeon to the physician and surgeon who is making the additions. (3) A physician and surgeon altering, modifying, or editing the patient notes of a physician and surgeon postgraduate training licensee, intern, resident, or postdoctoral fellow who the physician and surgeon is supervising.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.